Hawaii statutes.
§458-9 Revocation or suspension of
licenses. In addition to any other actions authorized by law, the
director, in conformity with chapter 91, may revoke or suspend any license
issued under this chapter for any cause authorized by law, including but not limited
to fraud or dishonesty in obtaining the license, for dishonesty, fraud, gross
negligence, or incompetency in the occupation of dispensing optician, or for
violation of this chapter. [L 1949, c 183, pt of §1; RL 1955, §69-9; HRS
§458-9; am L 1987, c 300, §11; am L 1992, c 202, §118; am L 1997, c 301, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next